Illinois, session 104th, HB791.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Clinical Laboratory and Blood Bank 5Act is amended by changing Section 1-101 as follows: 6    (210 ILCS 25/1-101)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 621-101)7    Sec. 1-101. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Illinois Clinical Laboratory and Blood Bank Act.9(Source: P.A. 87-1269.)